Hawaii statutes.
[§346-252] Advanced age. An individual
shall not be involuntarily subjected to the provisions of this part solely
based on advanced age. [L 1989, c 381, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 144, §1 and c
234, §9]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next